Louisiana, session 2026, HB1248.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 56:129 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§129. Possession of white-tailed deer; prohibitions
Wildlife rehabilitators permitted pursuant to LAC 76:V.131 may possess
white-tailed deer subject to the following provisions:
(1) Rehabilitation of white-tailed deer originating from outside of Louisiana
shall be strictly prohibited.
(2) The rehabilitation of injured or orphaned white-tailed deer originating
from within a Chronic Wasting Disease (CWD) Management Zone shall be
permitted; however, any such deer shall be rehabilitated and released only within the
boundaries of the same CWD Management Zone from which the animal originated.
(a) Any person or entity engaged in the rehabilitation of such deer shall be
strictly responsible for the monitoring of the animal's health during rehabilitation and
shall maintain a diligent watch for any neurological symptoms or other indicators
consistent with CWD.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1248 ENROLLED
(b) Failure to comply with the provisions of this Paragraph shall constitute
a violation subject to penalties as provided by law, and may result in the revocation
of any applicable rehabilitation permit.
(3) Any animal that displays abnormal neurological symptoms shall be
euthanized and a CWD sample shall be submitted to the department. Until a
negative CWD result is received, all deer within the facility shall remain
quarantined.
(4) If any deer from a rehabilitation facility receives a positive CWD result,
all live white-tailed deer shall be euthanized and CWD samples shall be collected.
That rehabilitation facility shall be prohibited from participating in deer
rehabilitation activities in the future.
(5) Any white-tailed deer that display open fractures, neurological
symptoms, or symptoms of epizootic hemorrhagic disease or bluetongue virus shall
be ineligible for rehabilitation.
(6) Any white-tailed deer that display signs of being habituated to humans
shall be ineligible for rehabilitation.
(7) The minimum enclosure size shall be fifteen feet by twenty feet by eight
feet for a single fawn. The pen shall be increased by fifty square feet for each
additional animal. The maximum number of fawns allowed per enclosure shall be
four, regardless of size. The enclosure shall be constructed of wood or wire with a
minimum thickness of twelve gauge with no greater than two-inch mesh or other
sturdy materials to prevent escape and to prevent domestic animals or predators from
gaining access to the pen. The enclosure shall be constructed in an area out of sight
of high traffic human and pet activity. If wire mesh fencing is used, a privacy or
shade cloth shall cover all sides.
(8) Once fawns are accustomed to drinking from a bottle, they shall be fed
only from a hanging rack.
(9) The wildlife rehabilitator shall notify the department permits coordinator
at least seventy-two hours in advance of a planned release. The predetermined
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1248 ENROLLED
release location sites shall be specified by the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries
prior to each release.
(10) No tags, collars, or other visual marks on white-tail deer to be released
shall be allowed.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.